dictsource/ro_rules
// translation rules for Romanian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


// replace s-comma, t-comma by s-cedilla, t-cedilla
.replace
 ș	ş
 ț	ţ
 Ș	ş	// because Windows doesn't convert upper-case Ș Ț to lower-case
 Ț	ţ

.group a
        a          a
        ai         ai
        ai (a      aj
        ai (_      'ai
     n) ai ((v     ai
        au         aU        // ?? only at end of word ??
     c) au (t      au
        au (d      au
        au (z      au
        au (r      au
        au (st     au
    _l) au (d      'au
        au (_      'au
        a (AAA     a
     &) a (_S1q    a

    gi) a (_S1q    a
    V@) a (N_      'a
    ăi) a (_       'a
     @) abil (_    'abil
     _) anti (@P4  anti
     @) ale (_     'ale
  @ion) a (_       'a


.group ă
        ă          @
        ăi (_      @i
        ău         @U        // ?? only at end of word ??
     c) ău (t      @u
    _b) ău (t      @u
    _l) ău (d      @u
    _d) ău (n      @u
        ău (_      '@U
     @) ăte (_S3t  @te
     @) ătă (_S3t  @t@
     @) ătul (_S4t @tul
     @) ătele (_S5t @tele
     @) ătului (_S6t @tului
     @) ătelor (_S6t @telor
     &) ă (_S1q    @
   &ec) ă (_       @
   @ăC) ă (_       @
   @er) ă (_       @
   @iţ) ă (_       @
     @) ă (Că_     =@
        ări (A_    @*'i
        ării (A_   '@Rii
        ării (_    @R'ii
        ări (AA_   @R'i
     @) ăie (_     =@Ie


.group â
        â          y
        âi         yi
        âu         yu
     @) âie (_     =yie


.group b
        b          b
        bb         b

     @) b (i_      b;
     @) b (il_     =b
     @) b (ila_    =b
     @) b (ili_    =b
     @) b (ilii_   =b
     @) b (ilului_ =b
     @) b (ililor_ =b
     @) b (ilile_  =b
   sta) bil (_     b'il
    mo) bil (_     b'il


.group c
        c          k
        c (e       tS
        c (i       tS
        ci (o      tS
        cii        tSii
        ch         k
    @@) col (_     =kol
    @@) coli (_S1t =I^
    @@) cole (_S1t e
     @) cni (_     kn'i
     @) cnea (_    kne'a



.group d
        d          d
        dd         d
     @) d (i_      d;


.group e
        e          e
     _) ei         ei
        ei (_      ei
//      eu       eu   // only at end of word ??
//      eu       e[u    // ??
     @) eu (l_     'eu
     @) eu (_      eu
     @) eu (_N     'eu
        ea         ea
     &) ea (_S2q   ea
     &) eSi        eaj
        eau        eau
        eo         e|o
     d) eo (seb    e|o
        e (AAA     e
     @) eş (_      =eS

     @) eşul (_    =eSul
     @) eşi (_     =eSI^
     @) eşului (_  =eSului
     @) eşilor (_  =eSilor

     //@) ec (a_   =ek
     //@) ec (ă_   =ek
     //@) ec (ii_  =etS
     //@) ec (i_ =etS
     //@) ec (ilor_ =etS
   //@At) ec (i@_  etS
   //@At) ec (A_   ek
   @At) ec (ii_    etS
//   &) es (_S1q e
    &C) e (re_     %e
   _ac) ee (a      ei

     r) ei (er_    'ei
     @) e (re_     =e
     @) e (ri_     =e
     @) e (rea_    =e
     @) e (rii_    =e
     @) e (rei_    =e
     i) e (re_     e
     i) e (ri_     e
     i) e (rii_    e
     i) e (rea_    e
     @) e (ra_     =e
     @) e (ră_     =e
    @f) e (ra_     e
    @f) e (ra_     e
     i) e (ră_     e
     i) e (ra_     e
        eoa        eo'a


.group f
        f          f
        ff         f
     @) f (i_      f;


.group g
        g          g
        g (e       dZ
        g (i       dZ
        gii (_       dZii
        gh         g
     &) gii (_     dZ'ii
     &) gi (A_     dZi
     @) gi (i_     dZ


.group h
        h          h
     @) h (i_      C


.group i
        i          i
        i (A       j
     @) i (e_      j
    &C) i (_NS1q   i/
     &) i (_NS1q   i
     &) i (-NS1q   i         // don't reduce to [I^] if a hyphen follows
     ţ) i (-Că     i
     ţ) i (-Ci     i
     ţ) i (-l      i
     ţ) i (-ne     i
    &') i (_       i
   ţi-) i (_       _         // combined with previous word as [iI]
    Cr) i (_+++    i
    V&) i (N_      'i        // verb
    
     @) i (A$p_alt1 i        // i is not [j]
    ăC) ia (_      'ia
    âC) ia (_      'ia
    ăC) ie (_      'ie
    âC) ie (_      'ie

     g) i (ne_     =i
     g) i (nea_    =i
     c) i (uC 
    cţ) ie (_      =ie
    cţ) iei (_     =iei
    cţ) ia (_      =ja
  graf) ie (_      'ie
  graf) ia (_      'ia
  graf) iei (_     'iei
  graf) ii (_      'iI
   nom) ie (_      'ie
   nom) ia (_      'ia
   nom) iei (_     'ei
  scop) ie (_      'ie
  scop) ia (_      'ia
  scop) iei (_     iei
  scop) ii (_      'ii
   fil) ie (_      'ie
   fil) ia (_      'ia
   fil) iei (_     'ei
    er) ia (_      'ia
    er) iei (_     'iei
    on) ie (_      'ie
    on) ia (_      'ia
    on) iei (_     'iei
    uş) ie (_      'ie
    uş) ia (_      'ia
    uş) iei (_     'iei
//   @) ie (_S1q ie
        iei (_     'iei
        ii         ii
     &) ii (_S2q   ii
        iii        iji
        iu (_      iu
        iu         ju

     &) ic (_      =ik
     &) ica (_     =ika
     &) ice (_     =itSe
     &) icile (_   =itSile
     &) icilor (_  =itSilor
     @) icii (_    =itSiI
     @) icei (_    =itSeI

   scr) i (e       'i
     &) ing (_     %iNg      // foreign words

        i (t_      'i
        ioa        jo'a

     @) işte (_    =iSte
     @) iştea (_   =iStea
     @) i (ţă_++++++++ =i
     @) i (ţe_     =i
     @) i (ţei_    =i
     @) i (ţelor_  =i
     -) i (_       j
     @) i (ţele_   =i


.group î
        î          y
     @) î (_       'y


.group j
        j          Z
     @) j (i_      Z;


.group k
        k          k


.group l
        l          l
        ll         l
     @) l (i_      l;
     _) l (_       le
     -) l (_       l         // -l

    iu) l (_S1t    l
     &) le (_S2t   le
     &) lor (_S3t  lor
     &) lui (_S3t  lui


.group m
     _) m (_       me
        m          m
        mm         m
     @) m (i_      m;
     _) m (-a      m

     -) mi (_      mi/


.group n
     _) n (_       ne
        n          n
     @) n (i_      n;
        n (g       N
        n (k       N
     @) n (tic_    =n
     @) n (ic_     =n
     _) n (-a      n
     -) n (_       n

@itudi) ne (_S2t   ne
@itudi) nea (_S3t  nea
@itudi) nii (_S3t  niI
@itudi) ni (_S2t   ni
@itudi) nile (_S4t nile
@itudi) nilor (_S5t nilor


.group o
        o          o
        oa         Oa
        oai        oaj
     _) oi         oi
        oi (_      'oi
        ou         ou
        ou (_N     'ou
        ou (_      ou
        o (AAA     o
    @C) o (riii_   'o


.group p
        p          p
        pp         p
     @) p (i_      p;
        ph         f

.group q
        q          k
        qu         kw


.group r
        r          R
        rr         R
     A) r (A       R
     C) r (A       @-R
        rr         RR
     A) r (i_      R;
     A) r (i       R'ii
        r (ă_      R
     _) re (@P2T   Re
     _) re (gul    Re
    @u) ri (_NS2t  RI^
     C) ri (_      @-Ri
    @u) ria (_S4t  Rja
    @u) rie (_S3t  Rje
    @u) ria (_S4t  R'ia
    @u) rie (_S3t  R'ie
    @u) rile (_S4t Rile
    @u) rilor (_S5t Rilor

     @) răm (_S1t  m
     @) răţi (_S4t R@tsI^
    @u) re (_S2t   Re


.group s
     _) s (_       se
     _) s (-a      s
        s          s
     -) s (_       s
        sh         S
        ss         s

     &) sprezece (_S8t sp@-*ez,etSe

     @) sem (_S1t  m
     @) seră (_S2t *@
     @) serăm (_S3t *@m
     @) serăţi (_S4t *@tsI^
     @) seşi (_S2t SI^
     @) sni (_     sn'i


.group ş
        ş          S
     @) ş (i_      S;

     @) şni (_     Sn'i
     -) şi (_      SI^
     @) și (_      S'i


.group t
        t          t
        tt (_      t
     @) t (i_      t;

        ts         ts
        tz         ts
        tt         t


.group ţ
        ţ          ts
     @) ţ (i_      ts;
//    @)  ţi (-mă  ts;'i
//    @)  ţi (-vă  ts;'i
//    @)  ţi (-le  ts;'i
//    @)  ţi (-i   ts;'ii
//    @)  ţi (-l   ts;'i

     -) ţi (_      ts;i/


.group u
        u          u
        u (A       u
        uia (_     uj'a
     _) ui         ui
        ui (_      'ui
     r) ui (n      ui
        ui (e      ui
    V&) ui (_N     u'i

  dest) ul         ul
     &) ul (_S2t   ul
   @ic) ul (_S2t   ul
   @ic) ule (_S3t  ule
   @ic) ului (_S4t ului
   @ic) uri (_S3   urI^
   @ic) urile (_S5 urile

     &) ului (_S4t ului
     @) us (_S2t   us
     @) usul (_S4t usul
     @) usuri (_S5t usuri
     @) usului (_S6t usului
     @) usurile (_SS´7t usurile
     @) usurilor (_S8t usurilor
   @ăC) u (N_      'u
     @) um (_S2q   um
     @) umul (_S4t umul
     @) umului (_S6t umului
     @) umuri (_S5t umuri
     @) umurile (_S7t umurile
     @) umurilor (_S8t umurilor
     c) um (_      um
     @) uie (_     =uie


.group v
        v          v
     @) v (i_      v;


.group w
        w          w


.group x
        x          ks
     e) x (a       gz
     e) x (e       gz
     e) x (i       gz
        x (e_      ks
  _ale) x          ks
    me) x (ic      ks
     e) x (iA_     ks
     e) x (iu      ks
     e) x (Ag      ks
    le) x (+       ks


.group y
        y          i
        y (A       j


.group z
        z          z
        zz         z
     @) z (i_      z;


.group  
        ä          E:
        ö          Y
        ü          y:
    D_) %          la_sut@
        %          p@-RotSent
        $          dolar

        , (D       v'irgul@

    __) - (_D      m'inus
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
